Utah statutes.
76-6-404.5.   Wrongful appropriation -- Penalties.
(1)  A person commits wrongful appropriation if he obtains or exercises
unauthorized control over the property of another, without the consent of the
owner or legal custodian and with intent to temporarily appropriate, possess,
or use the property or to temporarily deprive the owner or legal custodian of
possession of the property.
(2)  The consent of the owner or legal custodian of the property to its
control by the actor is not presumed or implied because of the owner's or
legal custodian's consent on a previous occasion to the control of the
property by any person.
(3)  Wrongful appropriation is punishable one degree lower than theft, as
provided in Section 76-6-412, so that a violation which would have been:
(a)  a second degree felony under Section 76-6-412 if it had been theft is a
third degree felony if it is wrongful appropriation;
(b)  a third degree felony under Section 76-6-412 if it had been theft is a
class A misdemeanor if it is wrongful appropriation;
(c)  a class A misdemeanor under Section 76-6-412 if it had been theft is a
class B misdemeanor if it is wrongful appropriation; and
(d)  a class B misdemeanor under Section 76-6-412 if it had been theft is a
class C misdemeanor if it is wrongful appropriation.
(4)  Wrongful appropriation is a lesser included offense of the offense of
theft under Section 76-6-404.
